Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.021

Registered agent.

(1) Each limited liability company shall continuously maintain in this state a registered agent in accordance with Article 4 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

(2) A limited liability company may change its registered agent by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of change in accordance with RCW 23.95.430.

(3) A registered agent may change its information on file with the secretary of state in accordance with RCW 23.95.435 or 23.95.440.

(4) A registered agent may resign as agent by executing and delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of resignation in accordance with RCW 23.95.445.

[ 2015 c 176 s 7103; 2015 c 188 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.